Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216I.05, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Setbacks; wind energy conversion systems. new text end new text begin A permit must not be granted under this chapter to construct a wind energy conversion system that is located within one mile of a residence. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to all wind energy conversion systems applying for a site permit under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 216I, on or after that date. new text end